South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 53-5-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 53-5-10. The first day of January-New Year's Day, the third Monday of January-Martin Luther King, Jr. Day, the third Monday in February-George Washington's birthday/President's Day, the tenth day of May-Confederate Memorial Day, the last Monday of May-National Memorial Day, the nineteenth day of June - Juneteenth, the fourth day of July-Independence Day, the first Monday in September-Labor Day, the eleventh day of November-Veterans Day, National Thanksgiving Day and the day after, and the twenty-fourth, twenty-fifth, and twenty-sixth days of December in each year are legal holidays. The holiday schedules of public colleges and universities, including technical colleges, shall not be in violation of this section so long as the number of holidays provided for in this section are not exceeded. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----